Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.80.040

Code cities encouraged to provide utility customers with landscaping information and to request voluntary donations for urban forestry.

(1) Code cities providing utility services under this chapter are encouraged to provide information to their customers regarding landscaping that includes tree planting for energy conservation.

(2)(a) Code cities providing utility services under this chapter are encouraged to request voluntary donations from their customers for the purposes of urban forestry. The request may be in the form of a check-off on the billing statement or other form of a request for a voluntary donation.

(b) Voluntary donations collected by code cities under this section may be used by the code city to:

(i) Support the development and implementation of urban forestry ordinances, as that term is defined in RCW 76.15.010, for cities, towns, or counties within their service areas; or

(ii) Complete projects consistent with the urban forestry management plans and ordinances developed under RCW 76.15.090.

(c) Donations received under this section do not contribute to the gross income of a light and power business or gas distribution business under chapter 82.16 RCW.

[ 2021 c 209 s 13; 2008 c 299 s 20; 1993 c 204 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 209: See note following RCW 76.15.005.

Short title—2008 c 299: See note following RCW 76.15.020.

Findings—1993 c 204: See note following RCW 35.92.390.